Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2041.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 8-201.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE8-201.01. Prohibitions A. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter or chapter 4, articles 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13 and 14 of this title: 1. A child who in good faith is being furnished Christian Science treatment by a duly accredited practitioner shall not, for that reason alone, be considered to be an abused, neglected or dependent child. 2. A child whose parent, guardian or custodian refuses to put the child on a psychiatric medication or questions the use of a psychiatric medication shall not be considered to be an abused, neglected or dependent child for that reason alone. B. A parent may not be considered as having abused, neglected or abandoned or be charged with abuse, neglect or abandonment of a biological, foster or adoptive child solely for seeking inpatient treatment or an out-of-home placement if the child's behavioral health needs pose a risk to the safety and welfare of the family. C. A parent may not be considered as having abused or neglected or be charged with abuse or neglect of a child solely for bringing into the home a biological, foster or adoptive child whose behavioral health needs pose a risk to the safety and welfare of the family. D. A parent, guardian or custodian may not be considered as having abused or neglected or be charged with abuse or neglect of a child solely based on the inability of the parent, guardian or custodian to provide the child with supervision, food, clothing, shelter or medical care if the inability is due solely to a lack of financial resources available to the parent, guardian or custodian. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 19, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.